District of Columbia statutes.
19-1310.01

Remedies for breach of trust.

(a)

A violation by a trustee of a duty the trustee owes to a beneficiary is a breach of trust.

(b)

To remedy a breach of trust that has occurred or may occur, the court may:

(1)

Compel the trustee to perform the trustee’s duties;

(2)

Enjoin the trustee from committing a breach of trust;

(3)

Compel the trustee to redress a breach of trust by paying money, restoring property, or other means;

(4)

Order a trustee to account;

(5)

Appoint a special fiduciary to take possession of the trust property and administer the trust;

(6)

Suspend the trustee;

(7)

Remove the trustee as provided in section 19-1307.06;

(8)

Reduce or deny compensation to the trustee;

(9)

Subject to section 19-1310.12, void an act of the trustee, impose a lien or a constructive trust on trust property, or trace trust property wrongfully disposed of and recover the property or its proceeds, or

(10)

Order any other appropriate relief.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-1307.06.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1001 of the Uniform Trust Code.